Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.135.010

Four-year student child care in higher education account—Program established.

The four-year student child care in higher education account is established. The office of student financial assistance shall administer the program for the four-year institutions of higher education. Through this program the office shall award either competitive or matching child care grants to state institutions of higher education to encourage programs to address the need for high quality, accessible, and affordable child care for students at higher education institutions. The grants shall be used exclusively for the provision of quality child care services for students at institutions of higher education. The university or college administration and student government association, or its equivalent, of each institution receiving the award may contribute financial support in an amount equal to or greater than the child care grant received by the institution.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 239; 2010 1st sp.s. c 9 s 5; 2008 c 162 s 2; 1999 c 375 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 9: See note following RCW 28A.650.035.

Intent—2008 c 162: "It is the intent of the legislature to improve access to higher education for all residents and ensure that students have the necessary resources and support services to attain their educational goals while keeping families strong. For many students, the lack of affordable, accessible, quality child care on or in close proximity to colleges and universities is a barrier to completion of their higher education goals. Further, it is the intent of the legislature to adopt policies that, to the extent possible, leverage existing resources and maximize educational outcomes by supporting affordable, accessible, and quality child care programs." [ 2008 c 162 s 1.]